Massachusetts, session 194th, H2606.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 17C of chapter 127 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following:- 
A state or county correctional facility, as defined in section 1 of chapter 125, shall, upon 
discharge of a detainee or prisoner who has: (i) a history of using opioids; (ii) been diagnosed 
with opioid use disorder; or (iii) experienced an opioid-related overdose, educate and instruct the 
individual on the use of opioid antagonists, provide information about where the individual can 
access opioid antagonists in the community, and dispense not less than 2 doses of an opioid 
antagonist to the individual or their legal guardian. The commissioner may promulgate rules and 
regulations necessary to implement this section.